Massachusetts, session 194th, H1786.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 48 the following new section:
Section 48A. A sex offender who has been finally classified as a level 3 sex offender
shall be prohibited from renting, residing, or otherwise occupying a single-family dwelling or a
unit in a multi-family dwelling with another finally classified level 3 sex offender, regardless of
the permanent or temporary residential status of either sex offender, unless those persons are
legally related by consanguinity, affinity or adoption.
A sex offender who violates this section shall be punished by a fine of $1,000 or
imprisonment in a house of correction for not more than 2 ½ years, or both such fine and
of 2

imprisonment. Written notification shall be made to the sex offender registry board of such
violation.
of 2